District of Columbia statutes.
9-308

Rochambeau Bridge.

The bridge built in lieu of the Long Bridge shall be for railroad purposes only and for 2 or more railway tracks. The Baltimore and Potomac Railroad Company shall maintain, and keep in repair said bridge at its own cost and expense, and shall maintain an efficient draw in said bridge, operating the same so as not to unnecessarily impede the free navigation of the Potomac River at any hour of the day or night, and shall give other railroad companies the right to pass over said bridge upon such reasonable terms as may be agreed upon between the companies or prescribed by Congress.

Feb. 12, 1901, 31 Stat. 772, ch. 353, § 11
Public utilities, multiple company use of utility infrastructures, see § 34-1102.
1981 Ed., § 7-508.
1973 Ed., § 7-508.